Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.190

For hire vehicle.

"For hire vehicle" means any motor vehicle used for the transportation of persons for compensation, except auto stages and ride-sharing vehicles.

[ 1979 c 111 s 13; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.190. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 20; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 111: See note following RCW 46.74.010.

Ride sharing: Chapter 46.74 RCW.